Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB339.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 281.600 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall:
(a) Exercise all administrative functions of the state in relation to motor carrier
transportation as defined in this chapter;[, and shall ]
(b) Apply, as far as practicable, the federal regulations and administrative and
judicial interpretations of acts administered by the Federal Motor Carrier
Safety Administration and other federal agencies under the United States
Department of Transportation;[. It shall ]
(c) Have the right to regulate motor carriers as provided in this chapter and[, to
that end, may] establish reasonable requirements with respect to continuous
and adequate service of transportation, systems of accounts, records and
reports, preservation of records, and safety of operation and equipment;
(d) Conduct administrative hearings in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
and[. It may issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum and orders of personal
attendance of witnesses, and production of pertinent records for any
proceeding before it, and permit the taking of depositions, all in accord with
the Rules of Civil Procedure, and it shall have the power to ]
(e) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A[as it may deem necessary] to carry out the provisions of this chapter,
including:
1. [. The department shall have the authority to promulgate ]Regulations
regarding safety requirements for motor vehicles and the method of
operation; and[, including ]
2. The adoption of [any of the ]federal motor carrier safety regulations[
and ].
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/19/2025 2:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1433
(2) Any motor vehicle operating contrary to safety regulations promulgated by the
department shall be in violation of this section.
(3)[(2)] Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions
of Title 49 of the United States Code adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, and not otherwise excepted by subsection (4) of this section, shall apply to
any driver, vehicle, or motor carrier subject to its jurisdiction within the
Commonwealth. Any provision of law that conflicts or is contrary to, or which
establishes a different compliance standard than Title 49 of the United States
Code adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and not otherwise
excepted by subsection (4) of this section, shall not apply to any driver, vehicle, or
motor carrier within the Commonwealth. This subsection shall not be construed
to negate any provision of law where Title 49 of the United States Code adopted
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section does not apply or where there is no
regulatory incompatibility[The provisions established by the Federal Highway
Administration in Title 49, Part 393 of the United States Code of Federal
Regulations shall not apply to:
(a) A motor vehicle or its towed unit having a fertilizer spreader attachment
permanently mounted thereon, having a gross weight not to exceed thirty-six
thousand (36,000) pounds, and used only for the transportation of bulk
fertilizer; or
(b) A farm-wagon-type tank trailer of not more than two thousand (2,000) gallon
capacity used during liquid fertilizer season as a field storage tank supplying
fertilizer to a field applicator, and moved on a public highway for the purpose
of bringing fertilizer from a local source of supply to a farm or field, or from
one (1) farm or field to another, provided that the vehicle is being operated
solely in intrastate transportation.
(3) The provisions established by the Federal Highway Administration in 49 C.F.R.
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/19/2025 2:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1433
sec. 390.21 and 49 C.F.R. pts. 391, 393, 395, and 396 shall not apply to a motor
vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(4)(a)1., or its towed unit, if:
(a) The vehicle is not engaged in interstate commerce;
(b) The vehicle is engaged in farming or agricultural related activities; and
(c) The gross vehicle weight, gross vehicle weight rating, gross vehicle
combination weight, or gross vehicle combination weight rating of the vehicle
and its towed unit is twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds or less].
(4) The provisions established by the Federal Highway Administration in 49 C.F.R.
secs. 391.41 to 391.49 and 49 C.F.R. pt. 395 shall not apply to a motor vehicle
registered under KRS 186.050(3)(b) or (4), or its towed unit, if:
(a) The vehicle is not engaged in interstate commerce;
(b) The vehicle is not transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded in
accordance with 49 C.F.R. pt. 172;
(c) The vehicle is not designed or used to transport sixteen (16) or more
passengers, including the driver; and
(d) The gross vehicle weight, gross vehicle weight rating, gross vehicle
combination weight, or gross vehicle combination weight rating of the vehicle
and its towed unit is twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds or less.
(5) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall exercise all administrative functions
of the state pertaining to the motor carrier safety management audit program. This
program shall be administered according to the provisions of the Federal Motor
Carriers Safety Act and the federal regulations promulgated under that Act.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/19/2025 2:11 PM Jacketed